Utah statutes.
63M-1-1211.   Management fee -- Additional financial assistance.
(1)  The corporation may charge a management fee on assets under management in
the Utah fund of funds.
(2)  The fee shall:
(a)  be in addition to any fee charged to the Utah fund of funds by the
venture capital investment fund allocation manager selected by the
corporation; and
(b)  be charged only to pay for reasonable and necessary costs of the
corporation.
(3)  The corporation may apply for and, when qualified, receive financial
assistance from the Industrial Assistance Account under Title 63M, Chapter 1,
Part 9, Industrial Assistance Account, and under rules made by the Board of
Business and Economic Development in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to help establish the program authorized
under this part.
